Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 7. Administrative Adjudication.
Sec. 44.62.530.
Default.

If the respondent does not file a notice of defense or does not appear at the hearing, the agency may take action based upon the respondent’s express admissions or upon other evidence, and affidavits may be used as evidence without notice to the respondent. If the burden of proof is on the respondent to establish that the respondent is entitled to the agency action sought, the agency may act without taking evidence.
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to deprive the respondent of the right to make a showing by way of mitigation.

History.

(§ 21 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Collateral references. —

2 Am. Jur. 2d, Administrative Law, §§ 292.

Sec. 44.62.540.
Reconsideration.

The agency may order a reconsideration of all or part of the case on its own motion or on petition of a party. To be considered by the agency, a petition for reconsideration must be filed with the agency within 15 days after delivery or mailing of the decision. The power to order a reconsideration expires 30 days after the delivery or mailing of a decision to the respondent. If no action is taken on a petition within the time allowed for ordering reconsideration, the petition is considered denied.

The case may be reconsidered by the agency on all the pertinent parts of the record and the additional evidence and argument that are permitted, or may be assigned to a hearing officer. A reconsideration assigned to a hearing officer is subject to the procedure provided in AS

44.62.500

. If oral evidence is introduced before the agency, an agency member may not vote unless that member has heard the evidence.

History.

(§ 22 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 10 ch 63 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 11 AAC 2.

Sec. 44.62.550.
Petition for reinstatement or reduction of penalty.

A person whose license is revoked or suspended may petition the agency for reinstatement or reduction of penalty after one year from the effective date of the decision or from the date of the denial of a similar petition.
The agency shall give notice to the attorney general of the filing of the petition, and the attorney general and the petitioner shall be given an opportunity to present either oral or written argument before the agency.
The agency shall decide the petition, and the decision must include the reasons for the decision.
This section does not apply if the statutes dealing with the particular agency contain different provisions for reinstatement or reduction of penalty.

History.

(§ 23 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The words of AS

44.62.330(d)

, “in a case of reinstatement or reduction of penalty,” refer to this section, which provides that a person whose license is revoked or suspended may petition the agency for reinstatement or reduction of penalty after one year from the effective date of the decision or from the date of denial of the similar petition. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.

A hearing to determine whether a penalty should be reduced or reinstated is necessary under this section because such a determination requires the agency to make findings of fact regarding conditions that have changed since the imposition of the penalty at least one year previous. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.

Sec. 44.62.560.
Judicial review.

Judicial review by the superior court of a final administrative order may be had by filing a notice of appeal in accordance with the applicable rules of court governing appeals in civil matters. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the notice of appeal shall be filed within 30 days after the last day on which reconsideration can be ordered, and served on each party to the proceeding. The right to appeal is not affected by the failure to seek reconsideration before the agency.

The complete record of the proceedings, or the parts of it which the appellant designates, shall be prepared by the agency. A copy shall be delivered to all parties participating in the appeal. The original shall be filed in the superior court within 30 days after the appellant pays the estimated cost of preparing the complete or designated record or files a corporate surety bond equal to the estimated cost.

The complete record includes

the pleadings;

all notices and orders issued by the agency;

the proposed decision by a hearing officer;

the final decision;

a transcript of all testimony and proceedings;

the exhibits admitted or rejected;

the written evidence; and

all other documents in the case.

Upon order of the superior court, appeals may be taken on the original record or parts of it. The record may be typewritten or duplicated by any standard process. Analogous rules of court governing appeals in civil matters shall be followed where this chapter is silent, and when not in conflict with this chapter.

The superior court may enjoin agency action in excess of constitutional or statutory authority at any stage of an agency proceeding. If agency action is unlawfully withheld or unreasonably withheld, the superior court may compel the agency to initiate action.

History.

(§ 24 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Cross references. —

For court rule provisions that supersede some of the provisions of this section, see Appellate Rules 601 — 611, Alaska Rules of Court.

Sec. 44.62.570.
Scope of review.

An appeal shall be heard by the superior court sitting without a jury.

Inquiry in an appeal extends to the following questions: (1) whether the agency has proceeded without, or in excess of jurisdiction; (2) whether there was a fair hearing; and (3) whether there was a prejudicial abuse of discretion. Abuse of discretion is established if the agency has not proceeded in the manner required by law, the order or decision is not supported by the findings, or the findings are not supported by the evidence.

The court may exercise its independent judgment on the evidence. If it is claimed that the findings are not supported by the evidence, abuse of discretion is established if the court determines that the findings are not supported by

the weight of the evidence; or

substantial evidence in the light of the whole record.

The court may augment the agency record in whole or in part, or hold a hearing de novo. If the court finds that there is relevant evidence which, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, could not have been produced or which was improperly excluded at the hearing, the court may

enter judgment as provided in (e) of this section and remand the case to be reconsidered in the light of that evidence; or

admit the evidence at the appellate hearing without remanding the case.

The court shall enter judgment setting aside, modifying, remanding, or affirming the order or decision, without limiting or controlling in any way the discretion legally vested in the agency.

The court in which proceedings under this section are started may stay the operation of the administrative order or decision until

the court enters judgment;

a notice of further appeal from the judgment is filed; or

the time for filing the notice of appeal expires.

A stay may not be imposed or continued if the court is satisfied that it is against the public interest.

If further appeal is taken, the supreme court may, in its discretion, stay the superior court judgment or agency order.

If a final administrative order or decision is the subject of a proceeding under this section, and the appeal is filed while the penalty imposed is in effect, finishing or complying with the penalty imposed by the administrative agency during the pendency of the proceeding does not make the determination moot.

History.

(§ 25 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Sec. 44.62.580.
Continuances.

The agency may grant continuances.
If a hearing officer is assigned to a hearing, a continuance may not be granted except by the hearing officer for good cause shown.

History.

(§ 26 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Collateral references. —

2 Am. Jur. 2d, Administrative Law, § 335.

Sec. 44.62.590.
Contempt.

In a proceeding before an agency, the agency shall certify the facts to the superior court in the judicial district where the proceeding is held if a person in the proceeding

disobeys or resists a lawful order;

refuses to respond to a subpoena;

refuses to take oath or affirmation as a witness;

refuses to be examined; or

is guilty of misconduct at a hearing or so near the hearing as to obstruct the proceeding.

Upon certification under (a) of this section, the court shall issue an order directing the person to appear before the court and show cause why the person should not be punished for contempt. The order and a copy of the certified statement shall be served on the person.

After service under (b) of this section, the court has jurisdiction of the matter.

The law applicable to contempt committed by a person in the trial of a civil action before the superior court applies to contempt under this section as to

the proceeding taken;

the penalties imposed; and

the way the person charged may be purged of the contempt.

History.

(§ 27 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to contempt, see generally AS

09.50.010

—

09.50.060

and Rule 90, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

Sec. 44.62.600.
Voting procedure.

A member of an agency qualified to vote on a question may vote by mail or by teleconferencing.
A vote by teleconferencing shall be recorded in a manner that identifies each person who has voted and how the person voted.

History.

(§ 28 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 6 ch 54 SLA 1985)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The present practice of allowing boards and commissions to conduct routine business by mail does not violate the Open Meetings Act. It neither constitutes a meeting, nor is it motivated by an intent to circumvent the Open Meetings Act. Rather, mail voting is expressly authorized by statute. It also furthers sound policy by reducing both administrative costs and administrative burdens. July 5, 1994 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 44.62.610.
Charge.

A sum authorized to be spent under AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

by an agency is a legal charge against the appropriations of the agency.

History.

(§ 29 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Sec. 44.62.620.
Power to administer oaths.

In a proceeding under AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

an agency, agency member, secretary of an agency, or hearing officer may administer oaths and affirmations and certify official acts.

History.

(§ 30 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Sec. 44.62.630.
Impartiality.

The functions of hearing officers and those officers participating in decisions shall be conducted in an impartial manner with due regard for the rights of all parties and the facts and the law, and consistent with the orderly and prompt dispatch of proceedings.
These officers, except to the extent required for the disposition of ex parte matters authorized by law, may not engage in interviews with, or receive evidence or argument from, a party, directly or indirectly, except upon opportunity for all other parties to be present.
Copies of all communications with these officers shall be served upon all parties.

History.

(§ 31 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959)